New York, session 2025-2026, S9095.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 1399-o of the public health law, 2 as added by chapter 102 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 5. a. [Use of an electronic cigarette or e-cigarette] Vaping, as 5 defined in subdivision nine of section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-n of 6 this article, shall not be permitted [on school grounds, as defined in 7 subdivision six of section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-n of this arti- 8 cle] in any educational institution. 9 b. ["Electronic cigarette" or "e-cigarette" shall have the same mean- 10 ing as in subdivision thirteen of section thirteen hundred ninety-nine- 11 aa of this chapter.] "Educational institution" shall mean any building, 12 structure, and surrounding outdoor grounds contained within a public or 13 private school, including pre-schools, nursery schools, primary schools, 14 secondary schools, and higher education institutions, including class- 15 rooms, libraries, laboratories, restrooms, cafeterias, and all other 16 indoor and outdoor areas owned or operated by the educational insti- 17 tutions. 18 c. Educational institutions shall educate students, teachers, staff, 19 and parents about the health risks associated with vaping and provide 20 information on available resources for smoking cessation. 21 d. (i) School administrators, teachers, resource officers and staff 22 members shall be responsible for monitoring and enforcing compliance 23 with this subdivision. 24 (ii) Violators of this subdivision shall be subject to appropriate 25 disciplinary action, pursuant to the policies of the respective educa- 26 tional institution. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08223-01-5 S. 9095 2 1 (iii) In case of repeated violations or non-compliance, educational 2 institutions may report the matter to the appropriate authorities for 3 further legal action, pursuant to applicable laws and regulations. 4 (iv) The department of education, in cooperation with the department, 5 shall develop an audio and online reporting program for incidents of 6 persistent occurrences. 7 e. (i) The department of education shall provide support and guidance 8 to educational institutions in implementing and enforcing the provisions 9 of this subdivision. 10 (ii) Government agencies, including but not limited to county public 11 health and nonprofit organizations, shall collaborate with educational 12 institutions to develop educational programs and awareness campaigns 13 highlighting the risks and consequences of vaping. 14 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 1399-p of the public health law, as 15 amended by chapter 335 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 3. The provisions of this section shall apply to after-school programs 18 that are subject to the provisions of subdivision four of section thir- 19 teen hundred ninety-nine-o of this article and educational institutions 20 that are subject to the provisions of subdivision five of section thir- 21 teen hundred ninety-nine-o of this article, provided that signs posted 22 pursuant to this subdivision shall specify the specific time period 23 during which smoking and vaping shall be prohibited. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect August 1, 2026. Effective immediately, 25 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 26 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 27 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.